Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3802
Franchise tax imposed.

(1) There is hereby imposed for each taxable year for the privilege of doing business in this state a franchise tax on all financial institutions with business locations in this state. Such franchise tax shall be based on the average deposits of the financial institution.

(2) The amount of the tax imposed by this section shall be the number of cents, as determined by section 77-3803, multiplied by the amount of average deposits of the financial institution in thousands of dollars.

(3) The franchise tax imposed by this section shall not exceed the limitation amount prescribed in section 77-3804.

(4) Each financial institution shall file a separate franchise tax return.

Laws 1986, LB 774, § 2.